Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.430

Refunds of moneys received or collected.

Any moneys collected or received by the director or his or her designee pursuant to the provisions of any marketing agreement or order during or with respect to any season or year may be refunded on a pro rata basis at the close of such season or year or at the close of such longer period as the director determines to be reasonably adapted to effectuate the declared policies of this chapter and the purposes of such marketing agreement or order, to all persons from whom such moneys were collected or received, or may be carried over into and used with respect to the next succeeding season, year or period whenever the director or a designee finds that the same will tend to effectuate such policies and purposes.

[ 2002 c 313 s 34; 1961 c 256 s 43.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.